South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5120.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-19-2020 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-2020.  (A) Except as provided herein, all information obtained and records prepared in the discharge of official duty by an employee of the court or department are confidential and must not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone, other than the judge, the child's attorney, or others entitled under this chapter or any other provision of law to receive this information, unless otherwise ordered by the court. The court may order the records be disclosed to a person having a legitimate interest and to the extent necessary to respond to that legitimate interest. However, these records are open to inspection without a court order where the records are necessary to defend against an action initiated by a child. (B) The director of the department must develop policies providing for the transmission of necessary and appropriate information to ensure the provision and coordination of services or assistance to a child under the custody or supervision of the department. This information must include that which is required for the admission or enrollment of a child into a program of services, treatment, training, or education. The information may be provided to another department or agency of state or local government, a school district, or a private institution or facility licensed by the State as a child-serving organization. This information may be summarized in accordance with agency policy. (C) The director is authorized to enter into interagency agreements for purposes of sharing information about children under the supervision or in the custody of the department. The agencies entering into these agreements must maintain the confidentiality of the information. (D) Reports and recommendations produced by the department for the court for the purpose of a dispositional hearing must be disseminated by the agency to the court, the solicitor, and the child's attorney. (E)(1) The department must notify the principal of a school in which a child is enrolled, intends to be enrolled, or was last enrolled upon final disposition of a case in which the child is charged with any of the following offenses: (a) a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60; (b) a crime in which a weapon, as defined in Section 59-63-370, was used; (c) assault and battery against school personnel, as defined in Section 16-3-612 where the victim is a school employee or volunteer; (d) assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature committed on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event against any person affiliated with the school in an official capacity; or (e) distribution or trafficking in unlawful drugs, as defined in Article 3, Chapter 53 of Title 44. (2) Each school district is responsible for developing a policy for schools within the district to follow to ensure that the confidential nature of a child offense history and other information received is maintained. This policy must provide for, but is not limited to: (a) the retention of the child offense history and other information relating to the child offense history in the child's school disciplinary file or in some other confidential location; (b) the destruction of the child offense history upon the child's completion of secondary school or upon reaching twenty-one years of age; and (c) limiting access to the child's school disciplinary file to school personnel. This access must only occur when necessary and appropriate to meet and adequately address the educational needs of the child. (F) When requested, the department must provide the victim of a crime with the name of the child and the following information retained by the department concerning the child charged with the crime: (1) other basic descriptive information, including but not limited to, a photograph; (2) information about the juvenile justice system; (3) the status and disposition of the delinquency action including hearing dates, times, and locations; (4) services available to victims of child crime; and (5) recommendations produced by the department for the court for the purpose of a dispositional hearing. (G) The department or the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division, or both, must provide to the Attorney General, a solicitor, or a law enforcement agency, upon request, a copy of a child offense history for criminal justice purposes. This information must not be disseminated except as authorized in Section 63-19-2030. The department and the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division must maintain the child offense history of a person for the same period as for offenses committed by an adult. (H) Other information retained by the department may be provided to the Attorney General, a solicitor, or a law enforcement agency pursuant to an ongoing criminal investigation or prosecution. (I) The department may must fingerprint and photograph a child upon the filing of a petition, release from detention, release on house arrest, or commitment to a juvenile correctional institution as part of the admission process to any secure facility operated by the agency. Fingerprints and photographs taken by the department remain confidential and must not be transmitted to the State Law Enforcement Division, and kept separate from the fingerprint records of adults. The agency and the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division must not transmit the child's fingerprints and photographs except to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or another agency or person, except for the purpose of: (1) aiding the department in apprehending an escapee from the department; (2) assisting the Missing Persons Information Center in the location or identification of a missing or runaway child; (3) locating and identifying a child who fails to appear in court as summoned; (4) locating a child who is the subject of a house arrest order; or (5) as otherwise provided in this section. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive any statutory or common law privileges attached to the department's internal reports or to information contained in the file of a child under the supervision or custody of the department. SECTION 2.  Section 63-19-2030 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-19-2030.  (A) Except as provided herein, law enforcement records and information identifying children pursuant to this chapter are confidential and may not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone, other than those entitled under this chapter to receive the information. (B) Law enforcement records of children must be kept separate from records of adults. Information identifying a child must not be open to public inspection, but the remainder of these records are public records. (C) Law enforcement agencies must maintain admission and release records on children held in secure custody, nonsecure custody, or both. The records must include the times and dates of admission and release from secure and nonsecure custody and, if appropriate, the times and dates of transfer from one custody status to another. (D) Law enforcement information or records of children created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be shared among law enforcement agencies, solicitors' offices, the Attorney General, the department, the Office Department of Mental Health, the Department of Corrections, and the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services for criminal justice purposes without a court order. (E) Incident reports in which a child is the subject are to be provided to the victim of a crime pursuant to Section 16-3-1520. Incident reports, including information identifying a child, must be provided by law enforcement to the principal of the school in which the child is enrolled when the child has been charged with any of the following offenses: (1) a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60; (2) an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of fifteen years or more if committed by an adult; (3) a crime in which a weapon, as defined in Section 59-63-370, was used; (4) assault and battery against school personnel, as defined in Section 16-3-612 where the victim is a school employee or volunteer; (5) assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature committed on school grounds or at a school-sponsored event against any person affiliated with the school in an official capacity; or (6) distribution or trafficking in unlawful drugs, as defined in Article 3, Chapter 53 of Title 44. Incident reports involving other offenses must be provided upon request of the principal. This information must be maintained by the principal in the manner set forth in Section 63-19-2020(E) and must be forwarded with the child's permanent school records if the child transfers to another school or school district. (F) A child charged with any offense may be photographed by the law enforcement agency that takes the child into custody. If the child is taken into secure custody and detained, the detention facility must photograph the child upon admission. These photographs may only be disseminated for criminal justice purposes or to assist the Missing Persons Information Center in the location or identification of a missing or runaway child. (G) A child charged with an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more if committed by an adult must be fingerprinted by the law enforcement agency that takes the child into custody. If the child is taken into secure custody and detained, the detention facility must fingerprint the child upon admission. In addition, a law enforcement agency may petition the court for an order to fingerprint a child when: (1) the child is charged with any other offense; or (2) the law enforcement agency has probable cause to suspect the child of committing any offense. (H) The fingerprint records of a child must be kept separate from the fingerprint records of adults. The fingerprint records of a child must be transmitted to the files of the State Law Enforcement Division. (I) The fingerprint records of a child may be transmitted by the State Law Enforcement Division to the files of the Federal Bureau of Investigation only when the child has been adjudicated delinquent for having committed an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more if committed by an adult. (J) The fingerprint records of a child adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more if committed by an adult must be provided by the State Law Enforcement Division or the law enforcement agency who took the child into custody to a law enforcement agency upon request by that agency for criminal justice purposes or to assist the Missing Person Information Center in the location or identification of a missing or runaway child. (K) The fingerprints and any record created by the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division as a result of the receipt of fingerprints of a child pursuant to Section 63-19-2020(I) and this section must not be disclosed for any purpose not specifically authorized by law or court order. (L) Upon notification that a child has not been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would carry a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more if committed by an adult, the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division and the law enforcement agency who took the child into custody must destroy the fingerprints and all records created as a result of such information. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----